Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Duties of Licensed Pharmacists.

Secs. 08.80.270 — 08.80.290.
Report of employees and goods sold; affixing labels. [Repealed, § 28 ch 45 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 08.80.294.
Information about equivalent generic drugs and interchangeable biological products.

In addition to other information that may be required under state or federal laws or regulations, a pharmacist, when dispensing a brand-name prescription drug order that is

not a biological product, shall include the generic drug name that is an equivalent drug product for the drug dispensed;

a biological product, shall include the dispensed product’s

proprietary name, if available; or

proper name.

The generic drug name or proprietary or proper biological product name required under (a) of this section shall be placed directly on the container’s label near the brand name.

In this section,

“proper name” means a name that reflects scientific characteristics of the product such as chemical structure and pharmacological properties;

“proprietary name” means a name that is trademarked and registered for private use.

History.

(§ 1 ch 123 SLA 2004; am §§ 2, 3 ch 58 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), added “not a biological product,” at the beginning of (a)(1), added (a)(2), and made related changes; in (b), inserted “or proprietary or proper biological product name” following “generic drug name”; added (c).

Sec. 08.80.295.
Substitution of equivalent drug products or interchangeable biological products.

Unless the prescription indicates that it is to be dispensed only as written, the pharmacist may, with the consent of the patient, substitute an equivalent drug product or interchangeable biological product.

A pharmacist who substitutes an equivalent drug product or interchangeable biological product in compliance with this section and applicable regulations incurs no greater liability in filling the prescription than would be incurred in filling the prescription by dispensing the prescribed name brand product.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, if an interchangeable biological product exists for a biological product prescribed to a patient, the dispensing pharmacist or the pharmacist’s designee shall communicate to the prescribing practitioner information regarding the biological product provided to the patient, including the name and manufacturer of the biological product. The communication must be provided within three business days after dispensing the biological product as follows:

by making an entry that is electronically accessible to the prescribing practitioner through

an interoperable electronic medical records system;

an electronic prescribing technology;

a pharmacy benefit management system; or

a pharmacy record; or

if the pharmacist or the pharmacist’s designee is unable to make an entry through one of the means provided under (1) of this subsection, by facsimile transmission, telephone communication, electronic mail transmission, or transmission by other prevailing means, to the prescribing practitioner.

The dispensing pharmacist or the pharmacist’s designee is not required to communicate information under (c) of this section if the dispensed biological product is a refill of a prescription and is the same as the biological product that was dispensed on the previous filling of the prescription.

Entry into an electronic records system as described under (c)(1) of this section is presumed to provide notice to the prescribing practitioner.

A pharmacist shall maintain a record of a dispensed biological product for a minimum of two years after the date of the dispensing.

In this section, “designee” means an agent or employee of the dispensing pharmacist whom the dispensing pharmacist has authorized to communicate the information required under (c) of this section.

History.

(§ 15 ch 206 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 187 SLA 1976; am § 8 ch 94 SLA 1980; am § 31 ch 6 SLA 1984; am §§ 3, 4, 22 ch 146 SLA 1986; am § 18 ch 45 SLA 1996; am §§ 4, 5 ch 58 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For pharmacy practice standards, see 12 AAC 52, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a) and (b), inserted “or interchangeable biological product” following “drug product”; added (c) — (g).

Sec. 08.80.297.
Prescription prices available to consumer.

A pharmacist shall disclose the price of filling any prescription when requested by the consumer.

No contract or agreement may prohibit a pharmacy, pharmacist, or pharmacy benefits manager from informing a patient of a less costly alternative for a prescription drug or medical device or supply, which may include the amount the patient would pay without the use of a health care plan.

A pharmacist or person acting at the direction of a pharmacist shall notify the patient if a known less costly alternative for a prescription drug or medical device or supply is available, which may include the amount the patient would pay without the use of a health care plan.

In this section,

“health care plan” means a policy, contract, benefit, or agreement that provides, delivers, arranges for, pays for, or reimburses any of the costs of health care services under

a health care insurance plan as defined under AS

21.54.500

;

a governmental or employee welfare benefit plan under 29 U.S.C. 1001 — 1191 (Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974);

a plan offered under AS

39.30.090

or

39.30.091

;

a federal governmental plan as defined under AS

21.54.500

;

the Medicaid or Medicare program; or

a self-insured employer benefit plan;

“pharmacy benefits manager” has the meaning given in AS

21.27.955

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 187 SLA 1976; am §§ 1, 2 ch 100 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision providing that the 2018 amendment to subsection (b) “applies to contracts entered into or renewed on or after September 5, 2018”, see sec. 6(b), ch. 100, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 5, 2018, added (b).

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, added (c) and (d).

Sec. 08.80.300
Record of prescriptions. [Repealed, § 28 ch 45 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 08.80.310
Record of sales. [Repealed § 28 ch 45 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 08.80.315.
Confidentiality of records.

Information maintained by a pharmacist in the patient’s records or that is communicated to the patient as part of patient counseling is confidential and may be released only to

the patient or as the patient directs;

a practitioner or pharmacist when, in the pharmacist’s professional judgment, release is necessary to protect the patient’s health and well-being; and

other persons or governmental agencies authorized by law to receive confidential information.

History.

(§ 19 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For guidelines for pharmacies and pharmacists, see 12 AAC 52, art. 4.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 52, art. 9.

Sec. 08.80.320.
Pharmacist required. [Repealed, § 28 ch 45 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 08.80.330.
Licensed pharmacist appointed as “pharmacist-in-charge”.

Each pharmacy shall have a pharmacist-in-charge. Whenever an applicable law or regulation requires or prohibits action by a pharmacy, responsibility shall be that of the owner and the pharmacist-in-charge, whether the owner is a sole proprietor, partnership, association, corporation, or otherwise. The pharmacist-in-charge shall ensure compliance with all laws and regulations governing the operation of the pharmacy. A licensed pharmacist appointed as pharmacist-in-charge of a pharmacy shall immediately advise the board of that appointment.

A license may not be issued to a pharmacy unless there is a licensed registered pharmacist-in-charge whose name appears on the face of the license.

History.

(§ 11(g) ch 194 SLA 1955; am § 18 ch 206 SLA 1972; am § 20 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, registration, and permit requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 1.

For personnel, see 12 AAC 52, art. 2.

Sec. 08.80.335.
Prescription for an opioid; voluntary request for lesser quantity.

A pharmacist filling a prescription for an opioid that is a schedule II or III controlled substance under federal law may, at the request of the individual for whom the prescription is written, dispense the prescribed opioid in a lesser quantity than prescribed.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent substitution of an equivalent drug under AS

08.80.295

.

History.

(§ 30 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as
AS 08.80.345; renumbered in 2017.

Effective dates. —

Section 30, ch. 2, SSSLA 2017, which enacted this section, took effect July 26, 2017.

Secs. 08.80.340 — 08.80.370.
Requirements for handling drugs; general prohibitions. [Repealed, § 28 ch 45 SLA 1996.]